Idaho, session 2025, H0275.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 33-132, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-132. LOCAL SCHOOL BOARDS -- INTERNET USE POLICY FILTERING RE-
QUIRED. (1) As a condition for receiving moneys from the state general fund,
each local school district and public charter school shall file an accept-
able internet use policy with the state superintendent of public instruction
no later than August 1, 2011, or within one (1) year after the creation of a
new district, whichever is later, and every five (5) years thereafter. Such
policy shall be approved by the district's board of trustees and shall con-
tain, but not be limited to, provisions that have internet content filters
that shall be included as part of any wireless internet access made available
to children. The content filters shall:
(a) Prohibit and prevent the use of school computers and other school
owned technology-related services from sending, receiving, viewing, or
downloading materials that are deemed to be harmful to minors, as de-
fined by section 18-1514, Idaho Code; and
(b) Provide for the selection of technology for the local district's
computers to filter Filter or block internet access to obscene materi-
als, materials harmful to minors, and materials that depict the sexual
exploitation of a minor, as defined in chapter 15, title 18, Idaho Code;
and.
(2) The filtering solution shall be configurable to school district and
public charter school policies regarding acceptable, age appropriate inter-
net content. The content filtering shall include the ability:
(a) For each school district and public charter school to manage its
own filtering policies, including the decision to block specific cate-
gories of content and to maintain its own whitelist and blacklist over-
rides;
(b) To provide individual school district and public charter school
utilization and filtering reports, including the most frequently
visited websites, the most frequently visited categories, the most fre-
quently blocked websites, the most frequently used search terms, and
the top authenticated users;


(c) To audit all changes to content filtering; and
(d) For all reporting and management of content filtering to be avail-
able through any internet-connected browser and efficiently perform
all content filtering functions.
(3) A school district or public charter school may offer digital or on-
line library resources to students in kindergarten through grade 12 only if
the vendor or other person or entity providing the resources verifies that
all the resources will comply with the provisions of subsection (4) of this
section.
(4) Digital or online library resources offered by school districts or
public charter schools to students in kindergarten through grade 12 shall
have safety policies and technology protection measures that:
(a) Prohibit and prevent a user from sending, receiving, viewing, or
downloading materials that are deemed to be harmful to minors, as de-
fined in section 18-1514, Idaho Code; and
(b) Filter or block access to obscene materials, materials harmful to
minors, and materials that depict the sexual exploitation of a minor, as
defined in chapter 15, title 18, Idaho Code.
(5) Notwithstanding any contract provision to the contrary, if a
provider of digital or online library resources fails to comply with the re-
quirements of subsection (4) of this section, the school district or public
charter school may withhold further payments, if any, to the provider pend-
ing verification of compliance with the provisions of subsection (4) of this
section.
(6) If a provider of digital or online library resources fails to timely
verify that the provider is in compliance with the requirements of subsec-
tion (4) of this section, the school district or public charter school may
consider the provider's act of noncompliance a breach of contract.
(7) School districts and public charter Schools shall have policies
that:
(c) (a) Establish appropriate disciplinary measures to be taken
against persons violating the policy provided for in this section; and
(d) (b) Include a component of internet safety for students that is in-
tegrated into the school district's or public charter school's instruc-
tional program; and
(e) (c) Inform the public that administrative procedures have been
adopted to enforce the policy provided for in this section and to handle
complaints about such enforcement, and that such procedures are avail-
able for review at the school district or public charter school office.
(2) (8) The policy provided for in subsection (1) of this section
may include terms, conditions, and requirements deemed appropriate by the
school district's board of trustees or the public charter school's governing
board, including, but not limited to, requiring written parental authoriza-
tion for internet use by minors or differentiating acceptable uses among
elementary, middle, and high school students.
(3) (9) The district's superintendent is hereby authorized to take rea-
sonable measures to implement and enforce the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. That Section 33-137, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.


SECTION 3. That Section 33-1025, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 4. That Section 33-2508, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-2508. DIGITAL AND ONLINE LIBRARY RESOURCES FOR K-12 STUDENTS. If
the commission for libraries provides digital or online library resources
for the use of students in kindergarten through grade 12, the commission
shall comply with all provisions of section 33-137 33-132, Idaho Code.
SECTION 5. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.